Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202525-21,252
Equine activities; applicability of other laws; liability enumerated.

(1) Sections 25-21,249 to 25-21,253 shall not apply to the horseracing industry as regulated in sections 2-1201 to 2-1229.

(2) Nothing in section 25-21,251 prevents or limits the liability of an equine activity sponsor, an equine professional, or any other person if the equine activity sponsor, equine professional, or person:

(a) Provided the equipment or tack and the equipment or tack caused the injury because the equine activity sponsor or professional failed to reasonably and prudently inspect or maintain the equipment or tack;

(b) Provided the equine and failed to make reasonable and prudent efforts to determine the ability of the participant to engage safely in the equine activity and determine the ability of the participant to safely manage the particular equine based on the participant's representations of his or her ability;

(c) Owns, leases, rents, or otherwise is in lawful possession and control of the land or facilities upon which the participant sustained injuries or death because of a dangerous latent condition which was known or should have been known to the equine activity sponsor, equine professional, or person and for which warning signs were not conspicuously posted;

(d) Commits an act or omission which a reasonable, prudent person would not have done or omitted under the same or similar circumstances or which constitutes willful or wanton disregard for the safety of the participant and that act or omission was a proximate cause of the injury; or

(e) Intentionally injures the participant.

(3) Nothing in section 25-21,251 prevents or limits the liability of an equine activity sponsor or an equine professional under product liability laws.

Laws 1997, LB 153, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB357, § 24.